Arkansas, session 2025, HB1655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5 is amended to add an additional chapter to
read as follows:
CHAPTER 80 — IMMIGRATION
5-80-101. Human smuggling.
(a) A person commits the offense of human smuggling if he or she
knowingly transports into the state an individual whom the person knows, or
reasonably should know, has entered the United States in violation of law and
has not been inspected by the United States Government since his or her
unlawful entry from another country.
(b) A person commits a separate offense for each individual he or she
transports into this state in violation of this section.
(c) Human smuggling is a:
(1) Class C felony for a second or subsequent offense under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section;
(2) Class D felony if the person receives anything of value in
return for the commission of the offense; or
*CEB169*
04-14-2025 09:12:43 CEB169

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 HB1655
(3) Class A misdemeanor if otherwise committed.
(d) This section does not restrict or prevent a school or an
institution of higher education from providing housing services to any
regularly enrolled student.
5-80-102. Harboring illegal immigrants.
(a) A person commits the offense of harboring illegal immigrants if he
or she knowingly conceals, harbors, or shields from detection an individual
whom the person knows, or reasonably should know, has entered the United
States in violation of law and has not been inspected by the United States
Government since his or her unlawful entry from another country.
(b) A person commits a separate offense for each individual he or she
harbors in violation of this section.
(c) Harboring illegal immigrants is a:
(1) Class C felony for a second or subsequent offense under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section;
(2) Class D felony if a person receives anything of value in
return for the commission of the offense; or
(3) Class A misdemeanor if otherwise committed.
(d) This section does not restrict or prevent a school or an
institution of higher education from providing housing services to any
regularly enrolled student.
/s/Long














04-14-2025 09:12:43 CEB169